hr-HR: Konfiguracija ožičenja: Neelektrično (suho); Prethodno ožičeno; Neožičeno; Bežično; Ostalo
zh-TW: 接線配置: 非電動 (乾式); 預先接線; 未接線; 無線; 其他
fi: Kytkentäkokoonpano: Ei-sähköinen (kuiva); Esijohdotettu; Johdottamaton; Langaton; Muu
ko: 배선 구성: 비전동식(건식); 사전 배선형; 미배선형; 무선; 기타
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ožičenja: Neelektrično (suho); Predhodno ožičeno; Neožičeno; Brezžično; Drugo
th: การกำหนดค่าการเดินสายไฟ: ไม่ใช้ไฟฟ้า (แห้ง); เดินสายไฟล่วงหน้า; ไม่ได้เดินสายไฟ; ไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
sv: Kabelkonfiguration: Icke-elektrisk (torr); Förkopplad; Okopplad; Trådlös; Övrigt
es: Configuración del cableado: No eléctrico (seco); Precableado; Sin cablear; Inalámbrico; Otro
lt-LT: Laidų konfigūracija: Neelektrinė (sausa); Iš anksto sujungta laidais; Nesujungta laidais; Belaidė; Kita
ja: 配線構成: 非電動 (ドライ); 配線済み; 配線なし; ワイヤレス; その他
fr: Configuration du câblage: Non électrique (sec); Précâblé; Non câblé; Sans fil; Autre
tr: Kablolama yapılandırması: Elektriksiz (kuru); Önceden kablolanmış; Kablolanmamış; Kablosuz; Diğer
da: Ledningskonfiguration: Ikke-elektrisk (tør); Fortrådet; Ufortrådet; Trådløs; Andet
ro-RO: Configurația cablajului: Neelectric (uscat); Pre-cablat; Necablat; Wireless; Altele
nb: Kablingskonfigurasjon: Ikke-elektrisk (tørr); Forhåndskablet; Ukablet; Trådløs; Annet
en: Wiring configuration: Non-electric (dry); Pre-wired; Unwired; Wireless; Other
pt-PT: Configuração da cablagem: Não elétrico (seco); Pré-cablado; Sem cablagem; Sem fios; Outro
bg-BG: Конфигурация на окабеляването: Неелектрическо (сухо); Предварително окабелено; Неокабелено; Безжично; Друго
pl: Konfiguracja okablowania: Nielektryczna (sucha); Wstępnie okablowana; Bez okablowania; Bezprzewodowa; Inna
cs: Konfigurace zapojení: Neelektrické (suché); Předem zapojené; Nezapojené; Bezdrátové; Jiné
nl: Bedrading configuratie: Niet-elektrisch (droog); Voorbedraad; Onbedraad; Draadloos; Overige
it: Configurazione del cablaggio: Non elettrico (a secco); Precablato; Non cablato; Wireless; Altro
ru: Конфигурация проводки: Неэлектрическая (сухая); С предварительной проводкой; Без проводки; Беспроводная; Другое
sk-SK: Konfigurácia zapojenia: Neelektrické (suché); S predpripravenou kabelážou; Bez kabeláže; Bezdrôtové; Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση καλωδίωσης: Μη ηλεκτρικό (ξηρό); Προκαλωδιωμένο; Χωρίς καλωδίωση; Ασύρματο; Άλλο
de: Verdrahtungskonfiguration: Nicht-elektrisch (trocken); Vorverdrahtet; Unverdrahtet; Kabellos; Sonstige
pt-BR: Configuração da fiação: Não elétrico (seco); Pré-cabeado; Sem fiação; Sem fio; Outro
hu: Kábelezési konfiguráció: Nem elektromos (száraz); Előkábelezett; Kábelezés nélküli; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
zh-CN: 接线配置: 非电动（干式）; 预接线; 未接线; 无线; 其他
vi: Cấu hình dây: Không dùng điện (khô); Nối dây sẵn; Không nối dây; Không dây; Khác